Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3109
Psychologist, defined.

Psychologist means a person licensed to engage in the practice of psychology in this or another jurisdiction. The terms certified, registered, chartered, or any other term chosen by a jurisdiction to authorize the autonomous practice of psychology shall be considered equivalent terms.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 71;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.09;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1043.